print/tex/TeX3.14/contrib/tex/hyphen/hyphen.german.min.tex
uft1s
u6gap
u8gn
ugo3s4
u1ha
u1he
u1hi
uh5la
uh1le
u1ho
uh1re
uhs8
u1hu
uh1w
6ui
u1ig
u3ins
u5isch.
u1j
6uk
u1ke
u1ki
u1k2l
uk3ler
u1k6n
u5ky
u1la
u1le
ul6lau
ul6le6l
ul6lo
u1lo
ulo6i
u1lu
ul2vr
3umfan
5umlau
um6san
u1mu
u1n1a
un2al
un6at
unau2
6und.
5undein
un4d3um
3undzw
une2b
un1ec
une2h
un3eis
3unfal
5ungea
ung2s1
1u2nif
un4it
unk5s
u1no
unpa2
uns2p
unvol4
unvoll5
u5os.
u1pa
u1pi
u1p2l
u1pr
up4s3t
up2t1a
upt5id
u1q
u1ra
ur5abs
ur5ah
u6rak
ur3alt
u6r5ans
ura6ri
u1re
ure5a
ur3eig
u1ri
u1ro
3ursac
ur4sk
3urtei
u1ru
uru5i6
uru6r
u1ry
ur2za
urz5w
us3a4gi
u2s1ar
u2s1au
u2s1ei
us3erk
us3erl
u8sl
u4st3a4b
us3tap
us3tau
u3ster
ustiz5
u2s1uf
u1tal
u1tan
ut1ar
u1tas
u1te
u4t3eng
u6terin
u4t3hei
ut5ho
ut1hu
u1ti
utine5
uti6q
u1to
uto5c
u1tr
ut1s6p
ut6s5tr
u1tu
u1u
u1v
uve5n
u1w
u1xe
u5ya
uy5e6
u1yi
u2z1eh
6vang
6varb
va6t5a
va2t1r
2v1b
6vd
6ve5g6
ver1
ve2re2
ve2s3p
ve3xe
2v1f
2v1g
6v5h
vie6w5
vi1g
vil6le.
vi1ru
vi1tr
2v1k
2v1l
6vm
4v5n
voi6le
v2or1
vo2re
vo2ro
vou6r5
2v1p
8vra
v6re
2v1s
2v1t
2v1v
6vw
2v1z
wa6g5n
1wah
wal6ta
3ware
war4za
1was
w5c
w1d
1weg
we2g1r
weg5s
weh6r5er
5weise
weit3r
wel4t
welt3a
welt3r
we6rat
wer4bl
5werdu
wer4fl
5werk.
wer4ta
we2sp
wich6s5t
1wid
wi2dr
wiede4
wieder5
wik6
wim6ma
win6d5r
3wirt
wisch5l
1wj
6wk
2w1l
w1n
wo1c
woche6
wol6f
wor6t5r
6ws2
w1sk
6w5t
wun6gr
wu1sc
wu2t1
6w5w
wy5a
1xag
x1ak
xa6men
x1an
x1b
x5c
1xe.
x3e4g
1xen
x1erz
1xes
8xf
8x1h
1xi
8xid
x1k
6x1l
x1m
8xn
1xo
8x3p2
x1r
x1s6
8x1t
x6tak
x2t1h
1xu
xu1e
x5ul
x5v
6x5w
x1z
5ya.
y5an.
y5ank
y1b
y1c
y6cha
y4chia
y1d
yen6n
y5ern
y5f
y1g
y1h
y5in
y1j
y1k2
y5lad
y1lak
yl1al
y5lax
y1le
y1lo
y5lu
ym1p2
y5mu
y1na
yno2d
yn1t
y1on.
y1o4p
y5ou
y1p
ypo1
y2ps
y2pt
y1r
yri3e
yr1r2
y1s
ys5iat
y1t
y3w
y1z
6z1a2b
zab5l
1zah
za5is
4z3ak
z3am
2z1ara
6z5as
z5atm
z5auf
3zaun
2z1b
6z1c
6z1d
1ze
ze4dik
4z3eff
zei4t3a
ze6la
4zemp
6z5engel
zer1k
zeu6gr
2z1ex
z1g
4z1h
1zi
zi3ell
zi1en
zi5es.
4z3imp
zi1na
6z5inf
6z5inni
8zinsuf
zi5th
zi1tr
6z1j
2z1k
2z1l
2z1m
6z1n
1zo
4z3oh
zo1on
6zor
4z1p6
6z1r
2z1t
z4t3end
z4t3hei
1zu
zu3al
zu1b4
zu1f2
6z5uhr
zun2a
zu1o
zu1s
zu1z
2z1v
zw8
z1wal
5zwang
zwei3s
z1wel
z1wer
z6werg
1zwi
zwi1s
6z1wo
z3wur
1zy
2z1z
zzi1s}
 
